California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) The board shall lease relocatable facilities to qualifying agencies providing child care and development services, including preschool or extended day care services, and shall charge rent of one dollar ($1) per year. The board shall require lessees to undertake all necessary maintenance, repairs, renewal, and replacement to ensure that a project is at all times kept in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the lessee. Neither the board nor the state shall assume any responsibility for utility services costs other than initial installation costs reimbursed under this chapter, and the agency shall provide adequate safeguards to protect the state’s interest in this regard.

(f) The board shall require lessees to insure at their own expense for the benefit of the state, any leased relocatable facility that is the property of
 the state, against any risks, including liability from the use thereof, in the amounts the board deems necessary to protect the interests of the state. Neither the board nor the state shall assume any responsibility for utility services costs other than initial installation costs reimbursed under this chapter, and the agency shall provide adequate safeguards to protect the state’s interest in this regard.

(g) No relocatable facilities shall be made available to an agency unless the agency furnishes evidence, satisfactory to the board, that the agency has no other facility available for rental, lease, or purchase in the geographic service area that is economically or otherwise feasible.

(h) The board shall have prepared for its use, performance specifications for relocatable facilities and bids for their construction that can be solicited from more than one responsible bidder. The
 board shall from time to time solicit bids from, and award to, the lowest responsible competitive bidder, contracts for the construction or purchase of relocatable facilities that have been approved for lease to eligible agencies that provide child care and development services, including preschool or extended day care services.

(i) If at any time the board determines that a lessees’ need for particular relocatable facilities that were made available to the lessee pursuant to this chapter has ceased, the board may take possession of the relocatable facilities and may lease them to other eligible contracting agencies, or, if there is no longer a need for the relocatable facilities, the board may dispose of them to public or private parties in the manner it deems to be in the best interests of the state.

(j) If a lessee uses a particular relocatable facility for only a portion of
 the year, the board may enter into a second lease with a public or private party for the use of that facility for the portion of the year during which the facility would otherwise be unused, in the manner it deems to be in the best interests of the state. The lessee shall be subject to subdivisions (d) and (f).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10473.

(a) The State Allocation Board shall establish regulations for the allocation of funds for capital outlay and for the reimbursement of initial utility installation costs for purposes of this chapter. The department shall establish qualifications for determining the eligibility of agencies providing child care and development services, including preschool and extended day care service, to apply for these funds.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, priority in funding of capital outlay grants or relocatables from funds administered pursuant to Section 10307 and under this chapter, shall be determined in the following order:

(1) Programs experiencing emergencies as
 defined by the department and the State Allocation Board.

(2) Expansion of child care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10474.

The State Allocation Board may use an amount not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), or 4 percent of the total funds available for the purposes of this chapter, whichever is less, in any given fiscal year for necessary administrative costs incurred pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the establishment of new administrative positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10475.

(a) The State Allocation Board may use up to 5 percent of any appropriation for the purposes of this chapter to provide loans to private nonsectarian child care and development programs not under contract with the department for renovation and repair of existing program facilities, in accordance with this section.

(b) The department shall establish qualifications to determine the eligibility of child care agencies for loans pursuant to this section.

(c) The board, with any necessary assistance from the department, may do any of the following:

(1) Establish procedures and policies in connection with the
 administration of this section it deems necessary.

(2) Adopt rules and regulations for the administration of this section requiring procedure, forms, and information it deems necessary.

(d) A recipient of a loan pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Document that the renovated facility shall comply with all laws and regulations applicable to child care facilities provided for pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that it will have sufficient revenues to pay the principal and interest on the loan and to maintain the operation of the child care facility.

(e) A recipient of a loan pursuant to this section shall assure the board that the renovated facility shall be used for purposes of the child care and development program for the following periods:

(1) For loans equal to or less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), not less than three years from the beginning of the loan period.

(2) For loans exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the fixed period of time shall increase one year for each additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or part thereof, to a maximum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(f) The board shall set the period of the loan for each recipient, up to a maximum of 10 years, based upon the amount of the loan, the recipient’s ability to repay the loan, and the length of time the
 recipient has committed to use the renovated facility for purposes of the child care and development program.

(g) Interest on the loan principal shall be charged at a rate equal to the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(h) In the event that a recipient ceases to use the renovated facility for purposes of the child care and development program prior to the expiration of the period specified pursuant to subdivision (e), the board shall collect the entire outstanding balance of the loan, plus interest, notwithstanding the loan period originally set pursuant to subdivision (f).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 31. Local Planning Councils [10480. - 10487.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10480. - 10480.]

10480.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Block grant” means the block grant contained in Title VI of the Child Care and Development Fund, as established by the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193).

(b) “Child care” means all licensed child care and development services and license-exempt child care, including, but not limited to, private for-profit programs, nonprofit programs, and publicly funded programs, for all children up to and including 12 years of age, including children with exceptional needs and children from all linguistic and cultural backgrounds.

(c) “Child care provider” means a person who provides child care services or represents persons who provide child care services.

(d) “Community representative” means a person who represents an agency or business that provides private funding for child care services, or who advocates for child care services through participation in civic or community-based organizations but is not a child care provider and does not represent an agency that contracts with the department to provide child care and development services.

(e) “Consumer” means a parent or person who receives, or who has received within the past 36 months, child care services.

(f) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(g) “Local planning council” means a local child care and development planning council as described in Section 10485.

(h) “Public agency representative” means a person who represents a city, county, city and county, or local educational agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Membership and Funding of Local Child Care Development Planning Councils [10485. - 10487.]

10485.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that local child care and development planning councils shall provide a forum for the identification of local priorities for child care and the development of policies to meet the needs identified within those priorities.

(b) The county board of supervisors and the county superintendent of schools shall do both of the following:

(1) Select the members of the local planning council. Before making selections pursuant to this subdivision, the board of supervisors and the county superintendent of schools shall publicize their intention to select the members and shall invite local organizations to submit nominations. In counties in which
 the superintendent is appointed by the county board of education, the county board of education may make the appointment or may delegate that responsibility to the superintendent.

(2) Establish the term of appointment for the members of the local planning council.

(c) (1) The local planning council shall be comprised as follows:

(A) Twenty percent of the membership shall be consumers.

(B) Twenty percent of the membership shall be child care providers, reflective of the range of child care providers in the county.

(C) Twenty percent of the membership shall be public agency representatives.

(D) Twenty
 percent of the membership shall be community representatives, who shall not be child care providers or agencies that contract with the department to provide child care and development services.

(E) The remaining 20 percent shall be appointed at the discretion of the appointing agencies.

(2) The board of supervisors and the county superintendent of schools shall each appoint one-half of the members. In the case of uneven membership, both appointing entities shall agree on the odd-numbered appointee.

(d) Every effort shall be made to ensure that the ethnic, racial, and geographic composition of the local planning council is reflective of the ethnic, racial, and geographic distribution of the population of the county.

(e) The board of supervisors and
 county superintendent of schools may designate an existing child care planning council or coordinated child and family services council as the local planning council, as long as it has or can achieve the representation set forth in this section.

(f) Upon establishment of a local planning council, the local planning council shall elect a chair and select a staff.

(g) Each local planning council shall develop and implement a training plan to provide increased efficiency, productivity, and facilitation of local planning council meetings. This may include developing a training manual, hiring facilitators, and identifying strategies to meet the objectives of the council.

(h) No member of a local planning council shall participate in a vote if the member has a proprietary interest in the outcome of the matter being voted
 upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10486.

(a) The department shall allocate child care funding pursuant to this part based on the amount of state and federal funding that is available.

(b) By May 30 of each year, upon approval by the county board of supervisors and the county superintendent of schools, a local planning council shall submit to the department and the State Department of Education the local priorities it has identified that reflect all child care needs in the county. To accomplish this, a local planning council shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct an assessment of child care needs in the county no less frequently than once every five years. The department shall define and prescribe data
 elements to be included in the needs assessment and shall specify the format for the data reporting. The needs assessment shall also include all factors deemed appropriate by the local planning council in order to obtain an accurate picture of the comprehensive child care needs in the county. The factors include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The needs of families eligible for subsidized child care.

(B) The needs of families not eligible for subsidized child care.

(C) The waiting lists for programs funded by the department.

(D) The need for child care for children determined by the child protective services agency to be neglected, abused, or exploited, or at risk of being neglected, abused, or exploited.

(E) The number of children in families receiving public assistance, including CalFresh benefits, housing support, and Medi-Cal, and assistance from the Healthy Families Program and the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program.

(F) Family income among families with preschool or schoolage children.

(G) The number of children in migrant agricultural families who move from place to place for work or who are currently dependent for their income on agricultural employment in accordance with subdivision (a) of, and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of, Section 10236.

(H) The number of children who have been determined by a regional center to require services pursuant to an individualized family service plan, or by a local educational agency
 to require services pursuant to an individualized education program or an individualized family service plan.

(I) The number of children in the county by primary language spoken pursuant to the department’s language survey.

(J) Special needs based on geographic considerations, including rural areas.

(K) The number of children needing child care services by age cohort.

(2) Document information gathered during the needs assessment that shall include, but need not be limited to, data on supply, demand, cost, and market rates for each category of child care in the county.

(3) Encourage public input in the development of the priorities. Opportunities for public input shall include at least one
 public hearing during which members of the public can comment on the proposed priorities.

(4) Prepare a comprehensive countywide child care plan designed to mobilize public and private resources to address identified needs.

(5) Conduct a periodic review of child care programs funded by the department to determine if identified priorities are being met.

(6) Collaborate with subsidized and nonsubsidized child care providers, county welfare departments, human service agencies, regional centers, job training programs, employers, integrated child and family service councils, local and state children and families commissions, parent organizations, early start family resource centers, family empowerment centers on disability, local child care resource and referral programs, and other interested parties to foster
 partnerships designed to meet local child care needs.

(7) Design a system to consolidate local child care waiting lists, if a centralized eligibility list is not already in existence.

(8) Coordinate part-day programs, including state preschool and Head Start, with other child care and development services to provide full-day child care.

(9) Submit the results of the needs assessment and the local priorities identified by the local planning council to the board of supervisors and the county superintendent of schools for approval before submitting them to the department.

(10) Identify at least one, but not more than two, members to serve as part of the department team that reviews and scores proposals for the provision of services funded through contracts
 with the department. Local planning council representatives may not review and score proposals from the geographic area covered by their own local planning council. The department shall notify each local planning council whenever this opportunity is available.

(c) The needs assessment data shall be made available to counties implementing individualized county child care subsidy plans pursuant to Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 10340).

(d) The department shall, in conjunction with all appropriate statewide agencies and associations, develop guidelines for use by local planning councils to assist them in conducting needs assessments that are reliable and accurate. The guidelines shall include acceptable sources of demographic and child care data, and methodologies for assessing child care supply and demand.

(e) The
 department shall allocate funding within each county in accordance with the priorities identified by the local planning council of that county and submitted to the department pursuant to this section, unless the priorities do not meet the requirements of state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10487.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any additional conditions imposed upon local planning councils shall be funded from available federal funds to the greatest extent legally possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 32. Head Start [10490. - 10490.]

10490.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Congress has recognized the importance of the transfer from preschool to primary school. Section 642A of Title VI of Subtitle A of Chapter 8 of Subchapter B of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35) was enacted to require grantees of federal Head Start funds to take steps to coordinate with and involve the local educational agency serving the community, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Developing and implementing a systematic procedure for transferring, with parental consent, Head Start program records for each participating child to the school in which the child will enroll.

(2) Establishing channels of communication between Head Start staff and their counterparts in the schools, including, but not limited to, teachers, social workers, and health staff, to facilitate the coordination of programs.

(3) Conducting meetings involving parents, kindergarten or elementary school teachers, and Head Start program teachers to discuss the educational, developmental, and other needs of individual children.

(4) Organizing and participating in joint transition-related training of school staff and Head Start staff.

(5) Developing and implementing a family outreach and support program in cooperation with entities carrying out parental involvement efforts under Title I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301
 et seq.).

(6) Assisting families, administrators, and teachers in enhancing educational and developmental continuity between Head Start services and elementary school classes.

(7) Linking the services provided in the Head Start program with the education services provided by the local educational agency.

(b) The department shall advise local education agencies of these federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 33. Expulsion and Suspension Procedures in Childcare and Development Services Programs [10491. - 10491.1.]

10491.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall apply:

(a) “Expulsion” means the permanent dismissal of a child from a program in response to a child’s behavior.

(b) “Licensed family childcare provider” means a childcare provider who participates in a state-funded early care and education program, as defined in Section 10421, and is an individual who operates a family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and is licensed pursuant to the requirement in Section 1596.80 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) “Program” means a general childcare and development program, as described in Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 10240), a childcare and development service for children with severe disabilities, as described in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), or a migrant childcare and development program, with the exception of migrant alternative payment programs, as described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), that serves children from zero to five years of age, inclusive.

(d) “Suspension” means any removal of a child from all or part of the program day, or the prevention of a child from attending the program for one or more days, in response to the child’s behavior.

(e) “Persistent and serious behaviors” means either repeated patterns of behavior that significantly interfere with the learning of other children, or interactions with peers and adults that are not responsive to the use of developmentally appropriate guidance. This includes, but is not limited
 to, physical aggression, property destruction, and self-injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 915, Sec. 8.   (AB 2806)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10491.1.

(a) (1) Except as authorized by paragraph (3), a program shall not do either of the following:

(A) Expel or unenroll a child because of a child’s behavior.

(B) Persuade or encourage a child’s parents or legal guardians to voluntarily unenroll from the program due to a child’s behavior.

(2) (A) If a child exhibits persistent and serious behaviors, the program shall expeditiously pursue and document reasonable steps, including, but not limited to, consulting with the child’s parents or legal guardians and teacher, and, if available, engaging an early childhood mental health consultant, to
 maintain the child’s safe participation in the program. The program shall inform the parents or legal guardians of a child exhibiting persistent and serious behaviors of the process described in this section in writing, including a description of the behaviors and the program’s plan for maintaining the child’s safe participation in the program.

(B) (i) If the child has an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, the program, with written parental consent, shall contact the agency responsible for the individualized family service plan or individualized education program to seek consultation on serving the child.

(ii) The program shall consider, if appropriate, completing a comprehensive screening to identify the needs of the child, including, but not limited to, screening the child’s social and emotional development, referring
 the child’s parents or legal guardians to community resources, and implementing behavior supports within the program.

(3) If a program has expeditiously pursued and documented reasonable steps to maintain the child’s safe participation in the program and determines, in consultation with the parents or legal guardians of the child, the child’s teacher, and, if applicable, the local agency responsible for implementing the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), that the child’s continued enrollment would present a serious safety threat to the child or other enrolled children, it shall refer the parents or legal guardians to other potentially appropriate placements, the local childcare resource and referral agency, or other referral service available in the local community, and, to the greatest extent possible, support direct transition to a more appropriate placement. The program may then unenroll the
 child.

(4) A program shall have up to 180 days to complete the process described in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), a program shall not do either of the following:

(A) Suspend a child due to a child’s behavior.

(B) Encourage or persuade a child’s parents or legal guardians to prematurely pick up a child due to a child’s behavior before the program day ends.

(2) Suspension shall only be used as a last resort in extraordinary circumstances when there is a serious safety threat that cannot be reduced or eliminated without removal. To the greatest extent possible, a program shall endeavor to ensure the full participation
 of enrolled children in all program activities.

(3) Before a program determines that suspension is necessary, the program shall collaborate with the child’s parents or legal guardians and use appropriate community resources, as needed, to determine no other reasonable option is appropriate, and provide written notice to the child’s parents or legal guardians pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(4) If suspension is deemed necessary, a program shall help the child return to full participation in all program activities as quickly as possible while ensuring child safety by doing all of the following:

(A) Continuing to engage with the parents or legal guardians and continuing to use appropriate community resources.

(B) Developing a written plan to
 document the action and supports needed.

(C) Providing referrals to appropriate community services.

(D) If the child has an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, the program, with written parental consent, shall contact the agency responsible for the individualized family service plan or individualized education program to seek consultation on serving the child.

(c) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall, commencing July 1, 2023, include in each contract for service with a program the limitations on expulsion and suspension provided in this section.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2023, upon enrollment of a child, a program shall notify the child’s parents or legal guardians of the limitations on
 disenrollment, including expulsion and suspension provided in this section. This notification shall be in writing and shall inform parents on how they may file an appeal to the department in the event of the expulsion or suspension of a child.

(3) Commencing July 1, 2023, in the event a program suspends or expels a child pursuant to this section, the program shall issue the child’s parent or guardian a written “Notice of Action, Recipient of Services,” as described in Section 18095 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, with the exception that the effective date of the action may be no less than 24 hours after service of the notice. The agency shall, at the same time, inform the parent or guardian in writing of their right to file an appeal of the action directly with the department no later than 14 calendar days after receipt of the notice. Because the action to suspend or expel a child involves persistent and serious behaviors that
 impact the safety of children, the action shall not be stayed during the pendency of any appeal.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with the State Department of Education, on or before December 31, 2023, implement this chapter through all-county letter or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(e) A program shall maintain records on, and, beginning on July 1, 2030, and subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the State Department of Social Services shall annually collect from contracting agencies, all of the following information:

(1) The number of times the process described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) was initiated during a program year, and the outcome of each reported instance.

(2) The number of times the process described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) was initiated during a program year, and the outcome of each reported instance, including, if applicable, how long a child was excluded from the program.

(3) The data collected pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall include for each child, at a minimum, age, sex, race and ethnicity, foster status, home language, disability, and whether the child has an individualized family service plan or an individualized education program.

(f) (1) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for
 this purpose, no later than January 1, 2031, and annually thereafter, the State Department of Social Services shall publish aggregate data on how many times during the most recent program year the processes described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) were initiated and the outcomes of the processes, disaggregated by student demographic, as required, and how many appeals or complaints the State Department of Social Services received from parents or legal guardians regarding expulsion and suspension. The data shall be made available at a statewide and countywide level and shall be disaggregated by age, sex, race and ethnicity, foster status, home language, disability, and assignment of an individualized family service plan or individualized education program, as applicable, pursuant to all applicable federal and state privacy protections.

(2) Data collection pursuant to subdivision (e), and
 reporting pursuant to this subdivision, by the State Department of Social Services shall, to the greatest extent possible, be undertaken within the framework of the department’s existing data systems.

(g) The State Department of Social Services shall create guidelines for offering additional support and requiring additional staff training for programs with exceptionally high numbers of suspension and expulsion reported pursuant to this section.

(h) (1) This section shall not apply to licensed family childcare providers until the joint labor-management committee established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10424.5 makes recommendations for potential changes related to suspensions and expulsions.

(2) Within 10 calendar days of the committee recommendations being completed,
 the State Department of Social Services and State Department of Education shall provide the committee recommendations to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 193, Sec. 15.   (SB 140)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 34. Whole Child Community Equity [10492. - 10492.2]

10492.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the End Racial and Economic Inequities in Childcare in California Initiative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   (AB 2832)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10492.1.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Education, and with input from early childhood stakeholders, shall develop the Whole Child Equity Framework (the Framework) and Whole Child Community Equity Screening Tool (the Equity Tool). The Framework shall outline categories that are essential to supporting children 0 to
 13 years of age, inclusive, through a whole child approach, including, but not limited to, access to childcare, physical and mental health services, education, childhood adversity and community safety, economic well-being, and built environments. “Built environments” means all of the physical parts of where families live and work such as homes, buildings, streets, open spaces, and infrastructure. The Framework shall guide the development of the Equity Tool that will consist of indicators aligned with each of the Framework’s categories. The Equity Tool will examine community-level data for the indicators and classify communities based on higher or lower values for these indicators. This approach will identify highest-need communities across the state with significant disparities across indicators that are essential to supporting the whole child. It will
 provide the data needed to support the equitable distribution of resources and monitor progress on addressing racial and economic inequities.

(b) With input from early childhood stakeholders, and in consultation with the State Department of Education, the State Department of Social Services shall develop the Equity Tool building on an existing index or set of indicators from existing indices such as the Child Opportunity Index, the California Healthy Places Index, the Human Development Index, the California Strong Start Index, the COVID-19 Statewide Vulnerability and Recovery Index, and the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and Agency for
 Toxic Substances and Disease Registry Social Vulnerability
 Index. Data available in Brilliant Beginnings, the California Cradle-to-Career Data System, and other relevant data can be utilized as needed. The State Department of Social Services shall also consider indicators that address disparities that impact young children related to state priorities such racial inequities reflected in learning loss and learning recovery due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   (AB 2832)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10492.2

(a) (1) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall convene a public workgroup to provide recommendations to the State Department of Social Services for the development of the Framework, the Equity Tool, and recommended uses of the Equity Tool for early childhood investments and whole child resources to address racial and economic inequities for California’s youngest children.

(2) The workgroup shall include parents and families from historically underserved communities and shall include, but not be limited to, other stakeholders that bring insight to support the whole child, which may include practitioners, experts, researchers, or advocates in childcare and development, physical and
 mental health, childhood adversity, family support and engagement, community safety, economic well-being, and built environments, representatives from First 5 California and local First 5 commissions, representatives of duly designated collective bargaining agents of family childcare home providers, and representatives from resource and referral agencies, local planning councils, and county offices of education. Workgroup members shall reflect the racial, ethnic, linguistic, and economic diversities of the State of California and represent the interests of individuals who are Black, Latinx, and Indigenous, people of color, multilingual communities, LGBTQIA+ families, children with disabilities, and families from socioeconomically disadvantaged communities that have been disproportionately marginalized. The workgroup shall provide updates to the Early Childhood Policy Council to ensure that the council is informed on the workgroup’s recommendations.

(3) The workgroup is subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) On or before January 1, 2025, with input from the workgroup, the State Department of Social Services shall finalize and present the Framework, the Equity Tool, and recommended uses of the Equity Tool to the Legislature. The Framework and the Equity Tool shall be used to build on the existing strengths of communities and support them to address their critical needs of young children.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall publish the tool for public use, including the data and methodology, on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 193.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ADMINISTRATION [10500. - 10985.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10500. - 10506.]

10500.

Every person administering aid under any public assistance program shall conduct himself with courtesy, consideration, and respect toward applicants for and recipients of aid under that program, and shall endeavor at all times to perform his duties in such manner as to secure for every person the amount of aid to which he is entitled, without attempting to elicit any information not necessary to carry out the provisions of law applicable to the program, and without comment or criticism of any fact concerning applicants or recipients not directly related to the administration of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

No person concerned with the administration of a public assistance program shall dictate how any recipient shall expend the aid granted to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

Any decisions governing eligibility for any of the following programs that, in California, are made by a county pursuant to this division shall be made exclusively by a merit or civil service employee of the county:

(a) The Medi-Cal program, as described in Chapter 7 (commencing with
 Section 14000) of Part 3.

(b) The In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program, as described in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3.

(c) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.

(d) The CalFresh program, as described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.

(e) The California Food Assistance Program (CFAP), as described in Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) of Part 6.

(f) The Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI)
 pursuant to Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6.

(g) The Adult Protective Services (APS) program, as described in Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750) of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (AB 1457)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.
